Arkansas, session 2025, HB1140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-18-710(a), concerning the definitions
related to student athlete concussion education, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) As used in this section,:
(1) "Healthcare provider" means a person who is licensed,
certified, or otherwise authorized by the laws of this state to administer
health care in the ordinary course of the practice of his or her profession,
including without limitation a physician, doctor of osteopathic medicine,
neuropsychologist, advanced practice registered nurse, certified athletic
trainer, physician assistant, and physical therapist; and
(2)(A) "Youth “youth athletic activity” means an organized
athletic activity in which the participants, a majority of whom are under
nineteen (19) years of age, are:
(A)(i) Engaged in an athletic game or competition against
another team, club, or entity; or
(B)(ii) In practice or preparation for an organized
athletic game or competition against another team, club, or entity.
*JMB096*
02-04-2025 10:04:55 JMB096

As Engrossed: H2/4/25 HB1140
(2)(B) “Youth athletic activity” does not include a college or
university activity or an activity that is incidental to a nonathletic
program.

/s/Gramlich































02-04-2025 10:04:55 JMB096